North Carolina, session 2025, HB35.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. Military Appreciation Month.
The month of November of each year is designated as Military Appreciation Month in the
State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H35-v-1*